Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202676-2212.03
Jurisdiction of practice, defined.

Jurisdiction of practice means any jurisdiction in which an appraiser devotes his or her time engaged in real property appraisal practice.

Laws 2014, LB717, § 9;

Laws 2015, LB139, § 25;

Laws 2020, LB808, § 62.